Wyoming statutes. Constitution of the State of Wyoming
Article 4. Executive Department

§ 1. Executive power vested in governor; term of governor.

The executive power shall be vested in a governor, who shall hold his office for the term of four (4) years and until his successor is elected and duly qualified.

Cross references. —

For provision that legislature shall meet in special session when convened by the governor, see art. 3, § 7, Wyo. Const.

As to administration of government generally, see title 9.

As to term of office of governor, see §

22-2-105

.

Effect of neglect to send appointee's name to senate. —

The fact that the governor neglected to send the name of an appointee to the senate did not deprive him thereafter of the power to appoint. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Applied

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

, 27 L.R.A. 45 (1893); State ex rel. Murane v. Jack, 52 Wyo. 173, 70 P.2d 888,

1937 Wyo. LEXIS 43

, 112 A.L.R. 161 (1937); Brinegar v. Clark, 371 P.2d 62,

1962 Wyo. LEXIS 82

(Wyo. 1962).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Wyoming Constitution: A Centennial Assessment,” see XXVI Land & Water L. Rev. 13 (1991).

§ 2. Qualifications of governor.

No person shall be eligible to the office of governor unless he be a citizen of the United States and a qualified elector of the state, who has attained the age of thirty years, and who has resided 5 years next preceding the election within the state or territory, nor shall he be eligible to any other office during the term for which he was elected.

Cross references. —

For definition of “qualified elector,” see § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

As to qualifications of electors, see §

22-3-102

.

Eligibility of governor to office of United States senator. —

The provision of this section that the governor should not be eligible to any other office during the term for which he was elected would not bar his candidacy for, and election to, the office of United States senator during his term as governor. The eligibility qualifications for the office of senator are set out in the United States constitution which controls as the supreme law of the land and such qualifications cannot be altered by the provisions of a state constitution. State ex rel. Johnson v. Crane, 65 Wyo. 189, 197 P.2d 864,

1948 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1948).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

, 6 L.R.A. (n.s.) 750 (1906); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

§ 3. Election of governor.

The governor shall be elected by the qualified electors of the state at the time and place of choosing members of the legislature. The person having the highest number of votes for governor shall be declared elected, but if two or more shall have an equal and highest number of votes for governor, the two houses of the legislature at its next regular session shall forthwith, by joint ballot, choose one of such persons for said office. The returns of the election for governor shall be made in such manner as shall be prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

For Election Code, see title 22.

§ 4. Powers and duties of governor generally.

The governor shall be commander-in-chief of the military forces of the state, except when they are called into the service of the United States, and may call out the same to execute the laws, suppress insurrection and repel invasion. He shall have power to convene the legislature on extraordinary occasions. He shall at the commencement of each session communicate to the legislature by message, information of the condition of the state, and recommend such measures as he shall deem expedient. He shall transact all necessary business with the officers of the government, civil and military. He shall expedite all such measures as may be resolved upon by the legislature and shall take care that the laws be faithfully executed.

Cross references. —

As to powers and duties of governor as commander-in-chief of the military forces of the state, see art. 17, § 5, Wyo. Const.

For other provisions concerning powers of the governor, see §§

9-1-201

to

9-1-219

.

Applied

in

Hilderbrand v. Padget, 678 P.2d 870,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 271

(Wyo. 1984).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

§ 5. Pardoning power of governor.

The governor shall have power to remit fines and forfeitures, to grant reprieves, commutations and pardons after conviction, for all offenses except treason and cases of impeachment; but the legislature may by law regulate the manner in which the remission of fines, pardons, commutations and reprieves may be applied for. Upon conviction for treason he shall have power to suspend the execution of sentence until the case is reported to the legislature at its next regular session, when the legislature shall either pardon, or commute the sentence, direct the execution of the sentence or grant further reprieve. He shall communicate to the legislature at each regular session each case of remission of fine, reprieve, commutation or pardon granted by him, stating the name of the convict, the crime for which he was convicted, the sentence and its date, and the date of the remission, commutation, pardon or reprieve with his reasons for granting the same.

Cross references. —

As to treason, see art. 1, § 26, Wyo. Const.

As to pardons and reprieves generally, see §§

7-13-801

to

7-13-806

.

Commutation deemed prerogative of executive. —

Possibilities of commutation are matters within the constitutional prerogative of the executive department and do not concern the court. Kennedy v. State, 595 P.2d 577,

1979 Wyo. LEXIS 413

(Wyo. 1979).

Court without jurisdiction to expunge criminal record for purpose of restoring civil rights. —

An expungement of a criminal record by a court, under its inherent powers, of one not pardoned, whose conviction was without error, and only for the purpose of restoring civil rights, would have been an encroachment on the power of the executive branch, i.e., the pardoning power of the governor, and the district court properly refused to take such action as being beyond its jurisdiction. Stanton v. State, 686 P.2d 587,

1984 Wyo. LEXIS 328

(Wyo. 1984).

Statutes regulating applications for pardon. —

Sections

7-13-803

to

7-13-806

, regulating applications for pardon and requiring the giving and publication of notice thereof, are directory only to applicants for pardon, and those moving in their behalf, prescribing a method by which they can procure a hearing before the governor. They do not limit or impose any restrictions upon the authority of the governor to grant pardons, nor is their effect enlarged by this section of the constitution. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

Officials not liable for withholding commutation order. —

A parole board official and the penitentiary warden were entitled to the defense of qualified immunity in a prisoner's civil rights action against them for withholding a commutation order while they sought to obtain a clarification of its ambiguity. Deckert v. Lang, 774 P.2d 1285,

1989 Wyo. LEXIS 130

(Wyo. 1989).

Applied

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990); Weldon v. State, 800 P.2d 513,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 132

(Wyo. 1990).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

Law reviews. —

For article, “The Changing Structure of Criminal Sentencing,” see XVIII Land & Water L. Rev. 591 (1983).

For article, “The Wyoming Criminal Code Revisited: Reflections after Fifteen Years,” see XXXIII Land and Water L. Rev. 523 (1998).

§ 6. Acting governor.

If the governor be impeached, displaced, resign or die, or from mental or physical disease or otherwise become incapable of performing the duties of his office or be absent from the state, the secretary of state shall act as governor until the vacancy is filled or the disability removed.

Cross references. —

For another provision authorizing secretary of state to perform duties of governor in case of impeachment, see §

9-1-211

.

Salary. —

Where the secretary of state became acting governor and performed the duties of both offices, he was entitled to receive the salary of both governor and secretary of state. State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(Wyo. 1903).

Pardoning power. —

A pardon granted by a secretary of state who was acting governor was valid. In re Moore, 4 Wyo. 98, 31 P. 980,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 3

(Wyo. 1893).

§ 7. When governor may fill vacancies in office.

When any office from any cause becomes vacant, and no mode is provided by the constitution or law for filling such vacancy, the governor shall have the power to fill the same by appointment.

Cross references. —

As to filling of vacancies in legislature, see art. 3, § 51, Wyo. Const.

As to power of governor to fill vacancies in case of impeachment, see §

9-1-203

.

As to power of governor to fill vacancy in the office of justice of the supreme court or judge of district court, see §

22-18-110

.

As to vacancies in other elected offices, see §

22-18-111

.

When office deemed vacant. —

An office cannot be said to be vacant while any person is authorized to act in it and does so act. State ex rel. Richardson v. Henderson, 4 Wyo. 535, 35 P. 517,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1894).

Under statute providing term of office shall be 6 years and “until successors are appointed and qualified,” no vacancy in office exists enabling governor to appoint successor without consent of senate while qualified person is in possession of office. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Change in judicial districts does not create vacancy. —

An act decreasing and changing boundaries of judicial districts of the state does not create any vacancy in office within the meaning of this section. Brown v. Clark, 47 Wyo. 216, 34 P.2d 17,

1934 Wyo. LEXIS 21

(Wyo. 1934).

Effect of military service. —

A district judge who during term of office entered the service of the United States as a major in advocate general's department, upon returning to and resuming the office of district judge, was a de jure and not a de facto judge, where he had not resigned and his office had not been declared vacant and no successor had qualified. State ex rel. Raymond v. Jefferis, 26 Wyo. 115, 178 P. 909,

1919 Wyo. LEXIS 4

(Wyo. 1919).

Acquiescence of hold-over officer in appointment of successor. —

Where governor's appointment to public office was invalid because there was no vacancy, there being an incumbent holding over after expiration of his term, but the old officer acquiesced in governor's appointee occupying his office, the former abandoned and vacated office and new appointee stood in his shoes as hold-over incumbent. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Death of hold-over officer. —

Where governor's appointment of new member to board was invalid because not confirmed by senate, death of hold-over member created vacancy which governor could fill by appointment, with new appointee standing in shoes of deceased. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Governor's appointment after incumbent's term expired became valid on incumbent's death to extent incumbent had right to office until successor qualified. However, since senate did not confirm appointment, and since appointment for regular term could not be made without consent of senate, appointee's name or that of someone to succeed him should go to senate at next session, and such person when confirmed would serve for balance of term which commenced when term of deceased incumbent expired. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Vacancy in the office of district judge

may be filled by appointment by the governor. In re Board of Comm'rs, 4 Wyo. 133, 32 P. 850 (Wyo. 1893).

Power of appointment without advice and consent of senate. —

Governor's power of appointment without advice and consent of senate is confined to cases when vacancy exists and no other mode for filling it has been provided. People ex rel. Warren v. Christian, 58 Wyo. 39, 123 P.2d 368,

1942 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(Wyo. 1942).

Effect of neglect to send appointee's name to senate. —

Governor's neglect to send name of appointee to senate did not deprive him of the power thereafter to appoint. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Term of appointee. —

A state engineer appointed to fill vacancy is entitled to hold office until the appointment and qualification of a successor. People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(Wyo. 1924).

Where a person appointed to fill a vacancy in the office of state treasurer is afterward elected to the office at a general election held before the term of his predecessor would have expired, he is not entitled to hold the office for 4 years after such election, but only for the remainder of his predecessor's term. State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

(Wyo. 1906).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

§ 8. Approval or veto of legislation by governor; passage over veto.

Every bill which has passed the legislature shall, before it becomes a law, be presented to the governor. If he approve, he shall sign it; but if not, he shall return it with his objections to the house in which it originated, which shall enter the objections at large upon the journal and proceed to reconsider it. If, after such reconsideration, two-thirds of the members elected agree to pass the bill, it shall be sent, together with the objections, to the other house, by which it shall likewise be reconsidered, and if it be approved by two-thirds of the members elected, it shall become a law; but in all such cases the vote of both houses shall be determined by the yeas and nays, and the names of the members voting for and against the bill shall be entered upon the journal of each house respectively. If any bill is not returned by the governor within three days (Sundays excepted) after its presentation to him, the same shall be a law, unless the legislature by its adjournment, prevent its return, in which case it shall be a law, unless he shall file the same with his objections in the office of the secretary of state within fifteen days after such adjournment.

This section applies to appropriation bills

as well as other statutes. State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1913).

Approval of erroneously enrolled bill. —

Where a bill as adopted by both houses provided for the disbursement of 23 percent of gasoline license taxes to counties but because of error in enrolling, the bill, as approved, provided for a disbursement of 25 percent of the revenue and the governor approved the bill with knowledge of the error but called attention thereto, such error should be corrected by the courts and the bill amended to read as adopted by the legislature. State ex rel. Bd. of Comm'rs v. Wright, 62 Wyo. 112, 163 P.2d 190,

1945 Wyo. LEXIS 31

(Wyo. 1945).

Unauthorized disapproval of a bill

by the governor does not defeat its enactment. State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1913).

Applied

in

Billis v. State, 800 P.2d 401,

1990 Wyo. LEXIS 119

(Wyo. 1990).

Quoted

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903); Arbuckle v. Pflaeging, 20 Wyo. 351, 123 P. 918,

1912 Wyo. LEXIS 40

(1918); Amoco Prod. Co. v. Hakala, 644 P.2d 785,

1982 Wyo. LEXIS 338

(Wyo. 1982).

Law reviews. —

For article, “How to Draft a Bill,” see 6 Wyo. L.J. 285.

For comment, “Wyoming's Administrative Regulation Review Act,” see XIV Land & Water L. Rev. 189 (1979).

See article, “Administrative Regulation Review — Act II,” XV Land & Water L. Rev. 207 (1980).

§ 9. Veto of items of appropriations.

The governor shall have power to disapprove of any item or items or part or parts of any bill making appropriations of money or property embracing distinct items, and the part or parts of the bill approved shall be the law, and the item or items and part or parts disapproved shall be void unless enacted in the following manner: If the legislature be in session he shall transmit to the house in which the bill originated a copy of the item or items or part or parts thereof disapproved, together with his objections thereto, and the items or parts objected to shall be separately reconsidered, and each item or part shall then take the same course as is prescribed for the passage of bills over the executive veto.

Editor's notes. —

Laws 2001, Senate Enrolled Joint Resolution No. 1, § 1, authorized the submission of a proposed amendment to the electors of the state of Wyoming at the next general election for approval or rejection to become valid as a part of the constitution if ratified by a majority of the electors.

The proposed amendment would have changed this section by limiting the governor's partial veto authority to apply only to general appropriations bills.

The amendment was not ratified by a majority of the electors at the November 5, 2002 general election.

Doctrine of great public interest. —

The court recognized the “doctrine of great public interest or importance” in connection with the existence of a justiciable controversy to support the invocation of their authority to make a declaratory judgment. Management Council of the Wyo. Legislature v. Geringer, 953 P.2d 839,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1998).

Purpose of section. —

This section provides for striking out such items of an appropriation as are improper, in order to overcome evil of forcing the executive to approve many unwise and improper appropriations. State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1913).

Approval of appropriation in part. —

The approval of $10,000 of an appropriation of $15,000, and disapproval of $5,000 was not a disapproval of the entire appropriation. State ex rel. Jamison v. Forsyth, 21 Wyo. 359, 133 P. 521,

1913 Wyo. LEXIS 26

(Wyo. 1913).

Veto power of Governor. —

The Governor has authority to veto substantive provisions of any bill making appropriations, even though the vetoed substantive provision does not appropriate money. Management Council of the Wyo. Legislature v. Geringer, 953 P.2d 839,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1998).

Quoted

in

Geringer v. Bebout, 10 P.3d 514,

2000 Wyo. LEXIS 181

(Wyo. 2000).

Cited

in

State ex rel. Chatterton v. Grant, 12 Wyo. 1, 73 P. 470,

1903 Wyo. LEXIS 23

(1903).

Law reviews. —

For case note, “Constitutional Law—Wyoming's Line Item Veto: Allowing the Governor to Legislate? Management Council of the Wyoming Legislature v. Geringer, 953 P.2d 839,

1998 Wyo. LEXIS 13

(Wyo. 1999),” see XXXIV Land & Water L. Rev. 451 (1999).

§ 10. Bribery or coercion of or by governor.

Any governor of this state who asks, receives or agrees to receive any bribe upon any understanding that his official opinion, judgment or action shall be influenced thereby, or who gives or offers, or promises his official influence in consideration that any member of the legislature shall give his official vote or influence on any particular side of any question or matter upon which he is required to act in his official capacity, or who menaces any member by the threatened use of his veto power, or who offers or promises any member that he, the governor, will appoint any particular person or persons to any office created or thereafter to be created, in consideration that any member shall give his official vote or influence on any matter pending or thereafter to be introduced into either house of said legislature; or who threatens any member that he, the governor, will remove any person or persons from office or position with intent in any manner to influence the action of said members, shall be punished in the manner now or that may hereafter be provided by law, and upon conviction thereof shall forfeit all right to hold or exercise any office of trust or honor in this state.

Cross references. —

As to crime of bribery, see §

6-5-102

.

§ 11. State officers; election; qualifications; terms.

There shall be chosen by the qualified electors of the state at the times and places of choosing members of the legislature, a secretary of state, auditor, treasurer, and superintendent of public instruction, who shall have attained the age of twenty-five (25) years respectively, shall be citizens of the United States, and shall have the qualifications of state electors. They shall severally hold their offices at the seat of government, for the term of four (4) years and until their successors are elected and duly qualified. The legislature may provide for such other state officers as are deemed necessary. (As amended by Laws 1981, House Joint Resolution No. 1, p. 330.)

Cross references. —

For definition of “qualified elector,” see § 22-1-102(a)(xxvi).

As to date of general election, see §

22-2-104

.

As to terms of office and offices voted on at general elections, see §

22-2-105

.

As to qualifications of electors, see §

22-3-102

.

Appointment by governor. —

The legislature may provide for such other state officers not enumerated in the constitution as are deemed necessary, and it seems that in the creation of such officers the governor may be vested by law with the sole power of appointing them, dispensing with the consent of the senate. Such, however, has not been the habit of the state or territorial legislatures in creating new offices, as such officials are generally required by the statutes to be appointed by the governor by and with the advice and consent of the senate, except only in case of vacancies. State ex rel. Richardson v. Henderson, 4 Wyo. 535, 35 P. 517,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1894).

Removal by governor. —

Since the governor is vested with power to appoint many subordinate officers for whose conduct he is in a measure responsible, the legislature may vest him with the further power to summarily remove such appointees for misconduct in office. State ex rel. Hamilton v. Grant, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 29

(Wyo.), reh'g denied, 14 Wyo. 41, 81 P. 795,

1905 Wyo. LEXIS 30

(Wyo. 1905).

Term limit statute unconstitutional as to Secretary of State. —

Wyo. Const. art. 1, § 3 prohibited the passage of any law conditioning political rights and privileges upon a circumstance or condition other than those enumerated. Because Wyo. Stat. Ann. §

22-5-103

conditioned the right to hold the office of Secretary of State on incumbency, not an enumerated condition, it was unconstitutional. Maxfield v. State, 2013 WY 14, 294 P.3d 895,

2013 Wyo. LEXIS 17

(Wyo. 2013).

District judge elected at a general election to fill a vacancy

is entitled to hold office for the full term of six years. State ex rel. Burdick v. Schnitger, 17 Wyo. 65, 96 P. 238,

1908 Wyo. LEXIS 7

(Wyo. 1908).

Applied

in

State ex rel. Irvine v. Brooks, 14 Wyo. 393, 84 P. 488,

1906 Wyo. LEXIS 19

, 6 L.R.A. (n.s.) 750 (1906).

Quoted

in

Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Jan 28, 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

Cited

in

People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(1924); Natrona County Sch. Dist. v. Ryan, 764 P.2d 1019,

1988 Wyo. LEXIS 153

(Wyo. 1988); Cathcart v. Meyer, 2004 WY 49, 88 P.3d 1050,

2004 Wyo. LEXIS 62

(2004).

Law reviews. —

For article, “A Loyalty Oath for Candidates,” see 5 Wyo. L.J. 146.

Am. Jur. 2d, ALR and C.J.S. references. —

Validity of age requirement for state public office, 90 ALR3d 900.

§ 12. State officers; powers and duties.

The powers and duties of the secretary of state, of state auditor, treasurer and superintendent of public instruction shall be as prescribed by law.

Cross references. —

As to secretary of state, see §§

9-1-301

to

9-1-307

.

As to state auditor and state treasurer, see §§

9-1-401

to

9-1-417

.

As to superintendent of public instruction, see §§

21-2-201

,

21-2-202

, and

21-13-301

.

Secretary of state must sign and affix the state seal to an appointment of the governor,

as it is no concern of the secretary whether he approves or disapproves the appointment. State ex rel. Miller v. Barber, 4 Wyo. 409, 34 P. 1028,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 22

(Wyo. 1893).

Quoted

in

Powers v. State, 2014 WY 15,

2014 Wyo. LEXIS 16

(Jan 28, 2014) and Powers v. State, No. 180-673 (1st Jud. Dist. Ct. Apr. 18, 2014).

§ 13. Salaries of governor and other elective state officers.

Until otherwise provided by law, the governor shall receive an annual salary of two thousand and five hundred dollars, the secretary of state, state auditor, state treasurer and superintendent of public instruction shall each receive an annual salary of two thousand dollars, and the salaries of any of the said officers shall not be increased or diminished during the period for which they were elected, and all fees and profits arising from any of the said offices shall be covered into the state treasury.

Cross references. —

For prohibition against increasing or diminishing salaries of public officers during term, see art. 3, § 32, Wyo. Const.

For amount of annual salaries, see §

9-3-101

.

§ 14. Examination of accounts.

The legislature shall provide by law for examination of the accounts of state treasurer, supreme court clerks, district court clerks, and all county treasurers, and treasurers of such other public institutions as the legislature may prescribe. (As amended by Laws 1989, Senate Joint Resolution No. 5, p. 771.)

Cross references. —

For other provisions concerning director of state department of audit, see §§

9-1-504

through

9-1-513

.

Act fixing the salary of the examiner operates as an appropriation

and does not require any additional appropriation to keep it alive. State ex rel. Henderson v. Burdick, 4 Wyo. 272, 33 P. 125,

1893 Wyo. LEXIS 11

(Wyo. 1893).

Vacancy in office of examiner. —

Where a statute provided that a vacancy in the office of state examiner should be filled by appointment by the governor until the next meeting of the legislature, and upon the resignation of the state examiner the governor appointed a person to fill the vacancy, but did not send the name of the appointee or of any other person to the next session of the legislature for confirmation, the person so appointed held over under art. 6, § 16, Wyo. Const., and no vacancy thereafter existed which could be filled by appointment under § 7 of this article. State ex rel. Richardson v. Henderson, 4 Wyo. 535, 35 P. 517,

1894 Wyo. LEXIS 8

(Wyo. 1894).

Cited

in

Board of Comm'rs v. Burns, 3 Wyo. 691, 29 P. 894,

1892 Wyo. LEXIS 12

(1892); People ex rel. Emerson v. Shawver, 30 Wyo. 366, 222 P. 11,

1924 Wyo. LEXIS 69

(1924).

§ 15. Great seal of state.

There shall be a seal of state which shall be called the “Great Seal of the State of Wyoming”; it shall be kept by the secretary of state and used by him officially as directed by law.

The seal of the Territory of Wyoming as now used shall be the seal of the state until otherwise provided by law.

Cross references. —

See also §

8-3-101

.